Missouri, session 2026, HB2119.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 67.2800, 67.2810, 67.2815, 67.2817, 67.2830, and 67.2840,
RSMo, are repealed and six new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
67.2800, 67.2810, 67.2815, 67.2817, 67.2830, and 67.2840, to read as follows:
67.2800. 1. Sections 67.2800 to 67.2840 shall be known and may be cited as the
"Property Assessment Clean Energy Act".
2. As used in sections 67.2800 to 67.2840, the following words and terms shall mean:
(1) "Assessment contract", a contract entered into between a clean energy
development board and a property owner under which the property owner agrees to pay an
annual assessment for a period of up to [twenty] thirty years not to exceed the weighted
average useful life of the qualified improvements in exchange for financing of an energy
efficiency improvement or a renewable energy improvement;
(2) "Authority", the state environmental improvement and energy resources authority
established under section 260.010;
(3) "Bond", any bond, note, or similar instrument issued by or on behalf of a clean
energy development board;
(4) "Clean energy conduit financing", the financing of energy efficiency
improvements or renewable energy improvements for a single parcel of property or a
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2119 2
unified development consisting of multiple adjoining parcels of property under section
67.2825;
(5) "Clean energy development board", a board formed by one or more municipalities
under section 67.2810;
(6) "Director", the director of the division of finance within the department of
commerce and insurance;
(7) "Division", the division of finance within the department of commerce and
insurance;
(8) "Energy efficiency improvement", any acquisition, installation, or modification on
or of publicly or privately owned property designed to reduce the energy consumption of such
property, including but not limited to:
(a) Insulation in walls, roofs, attics, floors, foundations, and heating and cooling
distribution systems;
(b) Storm windows and doors, multiglazed windows and doors, heat-absorbing or
heat-reflective windows and doors, and other window and door improvements designed to
reduce energy consumption;
(c) Automatic energy control systems;
(d) Heating, ventilating, or air conditioning distribution system modifications and
replacements;
(e) Caulking and weatherstripping;
(f) Replacement or modification of lighting fixtures to increase energy efficiency of
the lighting system without increasing the overall illumination of the building unless the
increase in illumination is necessary to conform to applicable state or local building codes;
(g) Energy recovery systems; and
(h) Daylighting systems;
(9) "Municipality", any county, city, or incorporated town or village of this state;
(10) "Program administrator", an individual or entity selected by the clean energy
development board to administer the PACE program, but this term does not include an
employee of a county or municipal government assigned to a clean energy development board
or a public employee employed by a clean energy development board who is paid from
appropriated general tax revenues;
(11) "Project", any energy efficiency improvement or renewable energy
improvement;
(12) "Property assessed clean energy local finance fund", a fund that may be
established by the authority for the purpose of making loans to clean energy development
boards to establish and maintain property assessed clean energy programs;

HB 2119 3
(13) "Property assessed clean energy program" or "PACE program", a program
established by a clean energy development board to finance energy efficiency improvements
or renewable energy improvements under section 67.2820;
(14) "Renewable energy improvement", any acquisition and installation of a fixture,
product, system, device, or combination thereof on publicly or privately owned property that
produces energy from renewable resources, including, but not limited to photovoltaic
systems, solar thermal systems, wind systems, biomass systems, or geothermal systems.
3. All projects undertaken under sections 67.2800 to 67.2840 are subject to the
applicable municipality's ordinances and regulations, including but not limited to those
ordinances and regulations concerning zoning, subdivision, building, fire safety, and historic
or architectural review.
4. Sections 67.2800 to 67.2840 shall not apply to any assessment contract,
project, or PACE program entered into, undertaken, or established for any residential
property.
67.2810. 1. One or more municipalities may form clean energy development boards
for the purpose of exercising the powers described in sections 67.2800 to 67.2840. Each
clean energy development board shall consist of not less than three members, as set forth in
the ordinance or order establishing the clean energy development board. Members shall serve
terms as set forth in the ordinance or order establishing the clean energy development board
and shall be appointed:
(1) If only one municipality is participating in the clean energy development board,
by the chief elected officer of the municipality with the consent of the governing body of the
municipality; or
(2) If more than one municipality is participating, in a manner agreed to by all
participating municipalities.
2. A clean energy development board shall be a political subdivision of the state and
shall have all powers necessary and convenient to carry out and effectuate the provisions of
sections 67.2800 to 67.2840, including but not limited to the following:
(1) To adopt, amend, and repeal bylaws, which are not inconsistent with sections
67.2800 to 67.2840;
(2) To adopt an official seal;
(3) To sue and be sued;
(4) To make and enter into contracts and other instruments with public and private
entities;
(5) To accept grants, guarantees, and donations of property, labor, services, and other
things of value from any public or private source, including the acquisition of loans or
assessment contracts from other states or their municipalities and political subdivisions

HB 2119 4
to serve a common purpose of providing financing support or credit enhancement for
any project;
(6) To employ or contract for such managerial, legal, technical, clerical, accounting,
or other assistance it deems advisable;
(7) To levy and collect special assessments under an assessment contract with a
property owner and to record such special assessments as a lien on the property;
(8) To borrow money from any public or private source and issue bonds and provide
security for the repayment of the same;
(9) To finance a project under an assessment contract;
(10) To collect reasonable fees and charges in connection with making and servicing
assessment contracts and in connection with any technical, consultative, or project assistance
services offered;
(11) To invest any funds not required for immediate disbursement in obligations of
the state of Missouri or of the United States or any agency or instrumentality thereof, or in
bank certificates of deposit; provided, however, the limitations on investments provided in
this subdivision shall not apply to proceeds acquired from the sale of bonds which are held by
a corporate trustee; and
(12) To take whatever actions necessary to participate in and administer a clean
energy conduit financing or a property assessed clean energy program.
3. No later than July first of each year, the clean energy development board shall file
with each municipality that participated in the formation of the clean energy development
board and with the director of the department of natural resources an annual report for the
preceding calendar year that includes:
(1) A brief description of each project financed by the clean energy development
board during the preceding calendar year, which shall include the physical address of the
property, the name or names of the property owner, an itemized list of the costs of the project,
and the name of any contractors used to complete the project;
(2) The amount of assessments due and the amount collected during the preceding
calendar year;
(3) The amount of clean energy development board administrative costs incurred
during the preceding calendar year;
(4) The estimated cumulative energy savings resulting from all energy efficiency
improvements financed during the preceding calendar year; and
(5) The estimated cumulative energy produced by all renewable energy
improvements financed during the preceding calendar year.
4. No lawsuit to set aside the formation of a clean energy development board or to
otherwise question the proceedings related thereto shall be brought after the expiration of

HB 2119 5
sixty days from the effective date of the ordinance or order creating the clean energy
development board. No lawsuit to set aside the approval of a project, an assessment contract,
or a special assessment levied by a clean energy development board, or to otherwise question
the proceedings related thereto shall be brought after the expiration of sixty days from the
date that the assessment contract is executed.
67.2815. 1. A clean energy development board shall not enter into an assessment
contract or levy or collect a special assessment for a project without making a finding that
there are sufficient resources to complete the project and that the estimated economic benefit
expected from the project during the financing period is equal to or greater than the cost of the
project.
2. An assessment contract shall be executed by the clean energy development board
and the benefitted property owner or property owners and shall provide:
(1) A description of the project, including the estimated cost of the project and details
on how the project will either reduce energy consumption or create energy from renewable
sources;
(2) A mechanism for:
(a) Verifying the final costs of the project upon its completion; and
(b) Ensuring that any amounts advanced or otherwise paid by the clean energy
development board toward costs of the project will not exceed the final cost of the project;
(3) An acknowledgment by the property owner that the property owner has received
or will receive a special benefit by financing a project through the clean energy development
board that equals or exceeds the total assessments due under the assessment contract;
(4) An agreement by the property owner to pay annual special assessments for a
period not to exceed [twenty] thirty years, as specified in the assessment contract;
(5) A statement that the obligations set forth in the assessment contract, including the
obligation to pay annual special assessments, are a covenant that shall run with the land and
be obligations upon future owners of such property; and
(6) An acknowledgment that no subdivision of property subject to the assessment
contract shall be valid unless the assessment contract or an amendment thereof divides the
total annual special assessment due between the newly subdivided parcels pro rata to the
special benefit realized by each subdivided parcel.
3. The total special assessments levied against a property under an assessment
contract shall not exceed the sum of the cost of the project, including any required energy
audits and inspections, or portion thereof financed through the participation in a property
assessed clean energy program or clean energy conduit financing, including the costs of any
audits or inspections required by the clean energy development board, plus such

HB 2119 6
administration fees, interest, and other financing costs reasonably required by the clean
energy development board.
4. The clean energy development board shall provide a copy of each signed
assessment contract to the local assessor and collector for the county, or city not within a
county, and shall cause a copy of such assessment contract to be recorded in the real estate
records of the recorder of deeds for the county, or city not within a county.
5. Special assessments agreed to under an assessment contract shall be a lien on the
property against which it is assessed on behalf of the applicable clean energy development
board from the date that each annual assessment under the assessment contract becomes due.
Such special assessments shall be collected by the collector for the county, or city not within a
county, in the same manner and with the same priority as ad valorem real property taxes[,
subject to the provisions of subsection 8 of this section]. Once collected, the collector for the
county, or city not within a county, shall pay over such special assessment revenues to the
clean energy development board in the same manner in which revenues from ad valorem real
property taxes are paid to other taxing districts. Such special assessments shall be collected
as provided in this subsection from all subsequent property owners, including the state and all
political subdivisions thereof, for the term of the assessment contract.
6. Any clean energy development board that contracts for outside administrative
services to provide financing origination for a project shall offer the right of first refusal to
enter into such a contract to a federally insured depository institution with a physical presence
in Missouri upon the same terms and conditions as would otherwise be approved by the clean
energy development board. Such right of first refusal shall not be applicable to the
origination of any transaction that involves the issuance of bonds by the clean energy
development board.
7. Except as otherwise provided in section 67.2840, sections 67.2816, 67.2817,
67.2818, and 67.2819 shall apply only to PACE programs for projects to improve residential
properties of four or fewer units. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any
clean energy development board formed to improve commercial properties, properties owned
by nonprofit or not-for-profit entities, governmental properties, or nonresidential properties in
excess of four residential units shall be exempt from the provisions of sections 67.2816,
67.2817, 67.2818, and 67.2819, nor shall such sections apply to the commercial PACE
programs and commercial PACE assessment contracts of any clean energy development
board engaged in both commercial and residential property programs. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, any clean energy development board that ceases to finance
new projects to improve residential properties of four or fewer units before January 1, 2022,
shall be exempt from the provisions of sections 67.2816, 67.2817, 67.2818, and 67.2819.

HB 2119 7
67.2817. 1. Notwithstanding any other contractual agreement to the contrary, each
assessment contract shall be reviewed, approved, and executed by the clean energy
development board and these duties shall not be delegated. Any attempted delegations of
these duties shall be void.
2. An assessment contract shall not be approved, executed, submitted, or otherwise
presented for recording unless a clean energy development board verifies that the following
criteria are satisfied:
(1) The PACE assessments are assessed in equal annual installments;
(2) The PACE assessment may be paid in full at any time without prepayment
penalty. The pay-off letter shall specify the amount of any fee or charge by a lender or loan
service agent to obtain the total balance due. The release of the assessment shall be recorded
within thirty days of the receipt of the amounts identified in the pay-off letter;
(3) The assessment contract shall disclose applicable penalties, interest penalties, or
late fees under the contract and describe generally the interest and penalties imposed under
chapter 140 relating to the collection of delinquent property taxes;
(4) The clean energy development board shall provide a separate statement to the
owner of the residential property of the penalties or late fees authorized under the assessment
contract and of the penalties and interest penalties under chapter 140 for the applicable tax
collector as of the date of the assessment contract;
(5) The clean energy development board has confirmed that the property owner is
current on property taxes for the project property;
(6) The property that shall be subject to the assessment contract has no recorded and
outstanding involuntary liens in excess of one thousand dollars;
(7) The property owner shall not currently be a party to any bankruptcy proceeding
where any existing lien holder of the property is named as a creditor;
(8) The term of the assessment contract shall not exceed the weighted average useful
life of the qualified improvements to which the greatest portion of funds disbursed under the
assessment contract is attributable, not to exceed [twenty] thirty years. The clean energy
development board shall determine useful life for purposes of this subdivision based upon
credible third-party standards or certification criteria that have been established by
appropriate government agencies or nationally recognized standards and testing
organizations;
(9) The property owner is current on all mortgage debt on the subject property and
has no more than one late payment during the twelve months immediately preceding the
application date on any mortgage debt; and
(10) The clean energy development board shall not enter into an assessment contract
or levy or collect a special assessment for a project without making a finding that there are

HB 2119 8
sufficient resources to complete the project and that the estimated economic benefit expected
from the project during the financing period is equal to or greater than the cost of the project.
3. Any assessment contract for a project that, combined with any existing and
outstanding indebtedness secured by the benefitted property, results in a loan-to-value ratio
between eighty percent and ninety-seven percent of the true value in money, as determined by
the assessor pursuant to chapter 137, plus ten percent of such amount, of the benefitted
property prior to the project as determined by reference to the assessment records for tax
purposes for the most recent completed assessment by the county, or city not within a county,
shall include provision of an insurance policy providing coverage for any remaining cost of
fulfilling the assessment contract, including any accumulated interest, in the event the
property is foreclosed upon, if such product exists. Such insurance policy shall run with the
land in the same manner as the other obligations set forth in the assessment contract.
4. The property owner executing the PACE assessment contract shall have a three-day
right to cancel the qualifying improvements proposed for financing under the PACE
assessment contract. The three-day right to cancel shall expire at midnight of the third
business day after a property owner signs the assessment contract. The clean energy
development board shall be required to provide a printed form that is presented to the
property owner no later than the time of signing of the assessment contract detailing the
property owner's right to cancel. An electronic form may be provided if the owner consents
electronically to receiving an electronic form.
5. Prior to the execution of an assessment contract, the clean energy development
board shall advise the property owner in writing that any delinquent assessment shall be a lien
on the property subject to the assessment contract and that the obligations under the PACE
assessment contract continue as an obligation against the improved property if the property
owner sells or refinances the property and that a purchaser or lender may require that before
the owner may sell or refinance the property that the owner may be required to pay the
assessment contract in full.
6. Prior to the execution of an assessment contract, the clean energy development
board shall advise the property owner in writing that if the property owner pays his or her
property taxes and special assessments via a lender or loan servicer's escrow program, the
special assessment will cause the owner's monthly escrow requirements to increase and
increase the owner's total monthly payment to the lender or the loan servicer. The clean
energy development board shall further advise the property owner that if the special
assessment results in an escrow shortage that the owner will be required to pay the shortage in
a lump-sum payment or catch up the shortage over twelve months.
7. The clean energy development board, within three days of entering an assessment
contract, shall provide any holder of a first mortgage loan a copy of the assessment contract

HB 2119 9
and a statement that includes a brief description of the project, the cost of the project, the
annual assessment that will be levied, and the number of annual assessments. Transmittal
shall be by United States mail to the holder of the first mortgage loan of record.
8. The clean energy development board shall maintain a public website with current
information about the PACE program as the board deems appropriate to inform consumers
regarding the PACE program. The website shall list approved contractors for the PACE
program. The website shall disclose the process for property owners or their successors to
request information about the assessment contract, the status of the assessment contract, and
for all questions including contract information to obtain a payoff amount for the release of an
assessment contract.
9. The clean energy development board, its agents, contractor, or other third party
shall not make any representation as to the income tax deductibility of an assessment.
67.2830. 1. A clean energy development board may issue bonds payable from special
assessment revenues generated by assessment contracts and any other revenues pledged
thereto. The bonds shall be authorized by resolution of the clean energy development board,
shall bear such date or dates, and shall mature at such time or times as the resolution shall
specify, provided that the term of any bonds issued for a clean energy conduit financing shall
not exceed [twenty] thirty years. The bonds shall be in such denomination, bear interest at
such rate, be in such form, be issued in such manner, be payable in such place or places, and
be subject to redemption as such resolution may provide. Notwithstanding any provision to
the contrary under this section, issuance of the bonds shall conform to the requirements of
subsection 1 of section 108.170.
2. Any bonds issued under this section shall not constitute an indebtedness of the state
or any municipality. Neither the state nor any municipality shall be liable on such bonds, and
the form of such bonds shall contain a statement to such effect.
67.2840. 1. Sections 67.2816, 67.2817, 67.2818, and 67.2819 shall be effective and
apply only to the residential PACE programs of clean energy development boards and
participating municipalities [after] from January 1, 2022, to August 28, 2026. Beginning
August 28, 2026, all residential properties shall be exempt from the provisions of
sections 67.2816 to 67.2819 and no assessment contract, project, or PACE program shall
be entered into, undertaken, or established for any residential property.
2. Sections 67.2816, 67.2817, 67.2818, and 67.2819 shall be effective and apply only
to residential PACE assessment contracts entered into after January 1, 2022, but before
August 28, 2026.
✔